Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Chapter 15. Motor Vehicle Safety — Responsibility

§ 63-15-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Mississippi Motor Vehicle Safety-Responsibility Law.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-40; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 39, eff from and after January 1, 1953.

§ 63-15-3.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases, when used in this chapter, shall, for the purposes of this chapter, have the meanings respectively ascribed to them in this section, except in those instances where the context clearly indicates a different meaning:

“Highway” means the entire width between property lines of any road, street, way, thoroughfare or bridge in the State of Mississippi not privately owned or controlled, when any part thereof is open to the public for vehicular traffic and over which the state has legislative jurisdiction under its police power.

“Judgment” means any judgment which shall have become final by expiration, without appeal, of the time within which an appeal might have been perfected, or by final affirmation on appeal, rendered by a court of competent jurisdiction of any state or of the United States, upon a cause of action arising out of the ownership, maintenance or use of any motor vehicle, for damages, including damages for care and loss of services, because of bodily injury to or death of any person, or for damages because of injury to or destruction of property, including the loss of use thereof, or upon a cause of action on an agreement of settlement for such damages.

“Motor vehicle” means every self-propelled vehicle (other than traction engines, road rollers and graders, tractor cranes, power shovels, well drillers, implements of husbandry and electric personal assistive mobility device as defined in Section 63-3-103) which is designed for use upon a highway, including trailers and semitrailers designed for use with such vehicles, and every vehicle which is propelled by electric power obtained from overhead wires but not operated upon rails.

For purposes of this definition, “implements of husbandry” shall not include trucks, pickup trucks, trailers and semitrailers designed for use with such trucks and pickup trucks.

“License” means any driver’s, operator’s, commercial operator’s, or chauffeur’s license, temporary instruction permit or temporary license, or restricted license, issued under the laws of the State of Mississippi pertaining to the licensing of persons to operate motor vehicles.

“Nonresident” means every person who is not a resident of the State of Mississippi.

“Nonresident’s operating privilege” means the privilege conferred upon a nonresident by the laws of Mississippi pertaining to the operation by him of a motor vehicle, or the use of a motor vehicle owned by him, in the State of Mississippi.

“Operator” means every person who is in actual physical control of a motor vehicle.

“Owner” means a person who holds the legal title of a motor vehicle; in the event a motor vehicle is the subject of an agreement for the conditional sale or lease thereof with the right of purchase upon performance of the conditions stated in the agreement and with an immediate right of possession vested in the conditional vendee or lessee or in the event a mortgagor of a vehicle is entitled to possession, then such conditional vendee or lessee or mortgagor shall be deemed the owner for the purpose of this chapter.

“Person” means every natural person, firm, copartnership, association or corporation.

“Proof of financial responsibility” means proof of ability to respond in damages for liability, on account of accidents occurring subsequent to the effective date of said proof, arising out of the ownership, maintenance or use of a motor vehicle, in the amount of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) because of bodily injury to or death of one (1) person in any one (1) accident, and subject to said limit for one (1) person, in the amount of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) because of bodily injury to or death of two (2) or more persons in any one (1) accident, and in the amount of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) because of injury to or destruction of property of others in any one (1) accident. Liability insurance required under this paragraph (j) may contain exclusions and limitations on coverage as long as the exclusions and limitations language or form has been filed with and approved by the Commissioner of Insurance.

“Registration” means a certificate or certificates and registration plates issued under the laws of this state pertaining to the registration of motor vehicles.

“Department” means the Department of Public Safety of the State of Mississippi, acting directly or through its authorized officers and agents, except in such sections of this chapter in which some other state department is specifically named.

“State” means any state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or any province of the Dominion of Canada.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-01; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 349, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 485, § 11; Laws, 2005, ch. 483, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 315, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 63-15-4.
Insurance card; exemptions; card to be kept in vehicle or displayed by electronic image; insurance company to provide; penalty.

The following vehicles are exempted from the requirements of this section:

Motor vehicles exempted by Section 63-15-5;

Motor vehicles for which a bond or a certificate of deposit of money or securities in at least the minimum amounts required for proof of financial responsibility is on file with the department;

Motor vehicles that are self-insured under Section 63-15-53; and

Implements of husbandry.

Every motor vehicle operated in this state shall have a motor vehicle liability insurance policy that covers the vehicle and is in compliance with the liability limits required by Section 63-15-3(j). The insured parties shall be responsible for maintaining the insurance on each motor vehicle.

An insurance company issuing a policy of motor vehicle liability insurance as required by this section shall furnish to the insured an insurance card for each motor vehicle at the time the insurance policy becomes effective. The insurance card may be furnished in either paper or electronic format as chosen by the insured. Acceptable electronic formats include display of electronic images on a cellular phone or any other type of electronic device. Beginning on July 1, 2013, insurers shall furnish commercial auto coverage customers with an insurance card clearly marked with the identifier, “Commercial Auto Insurance” or “Fleet” or similar language, to reflect that the vehicle is insured under a commercial auto policy.

Upon stopping a motor vehicle at a roadblock where all passing motorists are checked as a method to enforce traffic laws or upon stopping a motor vehicle for any other statutory violation, a law enforcement officer, who is authorized to issue traffic citations, shall verify that the insurance card required by this section is in the motor vehicle or is displayed by electronic image on a cellular phone or other type of electronic device. However, no driver shall be stopped or detained solely for the purpose of verifying that the motor vehicle is covered by liability insurance in the amounts required under Section 63-15-3(j) unless the stop is part of such roadblock. If the law enforcement officer uses the verification system created in Section 63-16-3 and receives a response from the system verifying that the owner of the motor vehicle has liability insurance in the amounts required under Section 63-15-3(j), then the officer shall not issue a citation under this section notwithstanding any failure to display an insurance card by the owner or operator.

Failure of the owner or the operator of a motor vehicle to have the insurance card in the motor vehicle, or to display the insurance card by electronic image on a cellular phone or other type of electronic device, is a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, is punishable by a fine of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) and suspension of driving privilege for a period of one (1) year or until the owner of the motor vehicle shows proof of liability insurance that is in compliance with the liability limits required by Section 63-15-3(j) and has paid the fines and assessments imposed and the driver’s license reinstatement fees imposed by the Department of Public Safety. A judge shall determine whether the defendant is indigent, and if a determination of indigence is made, shall authorize the reinstatement of that person’s driver’s license upon proof of mandatory liability insurance subject to compliance with a payment plan for any fines, assessments and/or fees. Fraudulent use of an insurance card shall be punishable in accordance with Section 97-7-10.If such fines are levied in a municipal court, the funds from such fines shall be deposited in the general fund of the municipality. If such fines are levied in any of the courts of the county, the funds from such fines shall be deposited in the general fund of the county. A person convicted of a criminal offense under this subsection (4) shall not be convicted of a criminal offense under Section 63-16-13(1) arising from the same incident.

If, at the hearing date or the date of payment of the fine the owner shows proof that such insurance was in effect at the time of citation, the case shall be dismissed as to the defendant with prejudice and all court costs shall be waived against the defendant.

No law enforcement officer may access any function, feature or other electronic image on a person’s cellular phone or other type of electronic device when enforcing the provisions of this section except for the electronic image of an insurance card shown to the officer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 302, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 483, § 5; Laws, 2005, ch. 498, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 487, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 504, § 8; Laws, 2013, ch. 475, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 421, § 1; brought forward without change, Laws, 2017, ch. 303, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 2018, ch. 454, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 13, 2018).

§ 63-15-5.
Applicability of chapter to government owned vehicles.

This chapter shall not apply with respect to any motor vehicle owned by the United States, the State of Mississippi or any political subdivision of this state. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed so as to exclude from this chapter its applicability to taxicabs, jitneys or other vehicles for hire operating under franchise or permit of any incorporated city, town or village.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-33; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 32, eff from and after January 1, 1953.

§ 63-15-7.
Administration of chapter; judicial review of orders and acts of department.

The department shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter and may make rules and regulations necessary for its administration, but may not require fees from insurance companies, and shall provide for hearings upon request of persons aggrieved by orders or acts of the department under the provisions of this chapter.

Any order or act of the department, under the provisions of this chapter, may be subject to review within ten days after notice thereof, by appeal to the county court at the instance of any party in interest and in the county wherein the person aggrieved by such order or act resides, or if there be no county court therein, then such jurisdiction shall be in the circuit court of said county, and such court is hereby vested with jurisdiction. The court shall determine whether the filing of the appeal shall operate as a stay of any such order or decision of the department. The court may, in disposing of the issue before it, modify, affirm, or reverse the order or decision of the department in whole or in part.

Trial in the court shall be de novo, with the burden of proof upon the department. The same shall be tried without regard to any prior holding of fact or law by the department, and judgment entered only upon the evidence offered at the trial by the court. A trial by jury may be had under the rules of the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-02; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 2; Laws, 2016, ch. 410, § 4, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2017.

§ 63-15-9.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2003, ch. 485, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2003.

[Codes, 1942, § 8295-04; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 4; Laws, 1970, ch. 486, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch 488, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 366, eff from and after passage (approved April 16, 1984).]

§§ 63-15-11 through 63-15-21.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2013, ch. 389, §§ 1 through 6, effective upon passage (approved March 20, 2013.)

§63-15-11. [Codes, 1942, § 8285-05; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 5; Laws, 1960, ch. 411, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 487, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 349, § 2; Laws, 1980, ch. 488, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 483, § 2, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2006.]

§63-15-13. [Codes, 1942, § 8285-06; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 6; Laws, 1960, ch. 411, § 2; Laws, 1970, ch. 485, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1970).]

§63-15-15. [Codes, 1942, § 8285-07; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 7; Laws, 1960, ch. 411, § 3, eff July 1, 1960.]

§63-15-17. [Codes, 1942, § 8285-08; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 8, eff from and after January 1, 1953.]

§63-15-19. [Codes, 1942, § 8285-09; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 9, eff from and after January 1, 1953.]

§63-15-21. [Codes, 1942, § 8285-10; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 10; Laws, 1960, ch. 411, § 4, eff July 1, 1960.]

§ 63-15-23.
Admissibility in evidence in civil actions of reports, etc. of department.

Neither the report required by Section 63-15-9, the action taken by the department pursuant to this chapter, the findings, if any, of the department upon which such action is based, nor the security filed as provided in this chapter shall be referred to in any way, or be any evidence of the negligence or due care of either party, at the trial of any action at law to recover damages. However, the report required by Section 63-15-9 may be referred to in proving uninsured status of the owner and the operator of a vehicle in any action to enforce a claim under the uninsured motorist provisions of an automobile liability policy, but only as provided in Section 13-1-124.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-11; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 11; Laws, 1981, ch. 361, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 63-15-25.
Certification to department of unsatisfied judgment; reports of convictions, pleas or actions in judicial proceedings for violations of motor vehicle laws.

Whenever any person fails within sixty days to satisfy any judgment, upon the written request of the judgment creditor or his attorney it shall be the duty of the clerk of the court, or of the judge of a court which has no clerk, in which any such judgment is rendered within this state, to forward to the department immediately after the expiration of said sixty days, a certified copy of such judgment.

If the defendant named in any certified copy of a judgment reported to the department is a nonresident, the department shall transmit a certified copy of the judgment to the official in charge of the issuance of licenses of the state of which the defendant is a resident.

The clerk of the court, or the judge of a court which has no clerk, in which any conviction for violation of a motor vehicle law is rendered, or in which a person charged with violation of a motor vehicle law has pleaded guilty or forfeited bail, shall forward immediately to the department a certified a copy of the judgment, order or record of other action of the court. This copy shall be prima-facie evidence of the conviction, plea or other action stated.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-12; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 12, eff from and after January 1, 1953.

§ 63-15-27.
Suspension of license, registration or operating privilege for nonpayment of judgment generally.

Upon the receipt of a certified copy of a judgment, the department shall forthwith suspend the license and registration and any nonresident’s operating privilege of any person against whom such judgment was rendered, except as hereinafter otherwise provided in this section and in Section 63-15-33.

If the judgment creditor consents in writing, in such form as the department may prescribe, that the judgment debtor be allowed license or nonresident’s operating privilege, the same may be allowed by the department, in its discretion, for six months from the date of such consent and thereafter until such consent is revoked in writing, notwithstanding default in the payment of such judgment, or of any installments thereof prescribed in Section 63-15-33, provided the judgment debtor furnishes proof of financial responsibility.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-13; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 13, eff from and after January 1, 1953.

§ 63-15-29.
Duration of suspension; effect of discharge in bankruptcy.

Such license and nonresident’s operating privilege shall remain so suspended and shall not be renewed, nor shall any such license be thereafter issued in the name of such person, including any such person not previously licensed, unless and until every such judgment is stayed, satisfied in full or to the extent hereinafter provided and until the said person gives proof of financial responsibility subject to the exemptions stated in Sections 63-15-27 and 63-15-33.

A discharge in bankruptcy following the rendering of any such judgment shall not relieve the judgment debtor from any of the requirements of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-14; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 14, eff from and after January 1, 1953.

§ 63-15-31.
Amounts required for satisfaction of judgment.

Judgments referred to in this chapter shall, for the purpose of this chapter only, be deemed satisfied:

When Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) has been credited upon any judgment or judgments rendered in excess of that amount because of bodily injury to or death of one (1) person as the result of any one (1) accident; or

When, subject to such limit of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) because of bodily injury to or death of one (1) person, the sum of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) has been credited upon any judgment or judgments rendered in excess of that amount because of bodily injury to or death of two (2) or more persons as the result of any one (1) accident; or

When Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) has been credited upon any judgment or judgments rendered in excess of that amount because of injury to or destruction of property of others as a result of any one (1) accident.

However, payments made in settlement of any claims because of bodily injury, death or property damage arising from a motor vehicle accident shall be credited in reduction of the amounts provided for in this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-15; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 15; Laws, 1972, ch. 349, § 3; Laws, 2005, ch. 483, § 3, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2006.

§ 63-15-33.
Allowance and effect of payment of judgment in installments; default.

A judgment debtor upon due notice to the judgment creditor may apply to the court in which such judgment was rendered for the privilege of paying such judgment in installments and the court, in its discretion and without prejudice to any other legal remedies which the judgment creditor may have, may so order and fix the amounts and times of payment of the installments.

The department shall not suspend a license or a nonresident’s operating privilege, and shall restore any license or nonresident’s operating privilege suspended following nonpayment of a judgment, when the judgment debtor gives proof of financial responsibility and obtains such an order permitting the payment of such judgment in installments, and while the payment of any said installment is not in default.

In the event the judgment debtor fails to pay any installment as specified by such order, then upon notice of such default, the department shall forthwith suspend the license or nonresident’s operating privilege of the judgment debtor until such judgment is satisfied, as provided in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-16; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 16, eff from and after January 1, 1953.

§ 63-15-35.
Requirement of proof of financial responsibility upon conviction, etc., of offense requiring suspension or revocation of license.

Whenever the department, under any law of this state, suspends or revokes the license of any person upon receiving record of a conviction or a forfeiture of bail, the department shall also suspend the registration for all motor vehicles licensed in the name of such person. However the department shall not suspend such license, unless otherwise required by law, if such person has previously given or shall immediately give and thereafter maintain proof of financial responsibility with respect to all motor vehicles licensed by such person.

Such license or licenses, as the case may be, shall remain suspended or revoked and shall not at any time thereafter be renewed nor shall any license be thereafter issued to such person until permitted under the motor vehicle laws of this state and not then unless and until he shall give and thereafter maintain proof of financial responsibility.

If a person is not licensed, but by final order of judgment is convicted of or forfeits any bail or collateral deposited to secure an appearance for trial for any offense requiring the suspension or revocation of license, or for operating a motor vehicle upon the highways without being licensed to do so, no license shall thereafter be issued to such person until he shall give and thereafter maintain proof of financial responsibility.

Whenever the department suspends or revokes a nonresident’s operating privilege by reason of a conviction or forfeiture of bail, such privilege shall remain so suspended or revoked unless such person shall have previously given or shall immediately give and thereafter maintain proof of financial responsibility.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-17; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 17, eff from and after January 1, 1953.

§ 63-15-37.
Methods of giving proof of financial responsibility generally.

Proof of financial responsibility when required under this chapter with respect to a motor vehicle or with respect to a person who is not the owner of a motor vehicle may be given by filing:

1. a certificate of insurance as provided in Section 63-15-39 or Section 63-15-41; or

2. a bond as provided in Section 63-15-49; or

3. a certificate of deposit of money or securities as provided in Section 63-15-51; or

4. a certificate of self-insurance as provided in section 63-15-53, supplemented by an agreement by the self-insurer that, with respect to accidents occurring while the certificate is in force, he will pay the same judgments and in the same amounts that an insurer would have been obligated to pay under an owner’s motor vehicle liability policy if it had issued such a policy to said self-insurer.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-18; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 18, eff from and after January 1, 1953.

§ 63-15-39.
Certificate of insurance as proof of financial responsibility; residents.

Proof of financial responsibility may be furnished by filing with the department the written certificate of any insurance company duly authorized to write motor vehicle liability insurance in this state certifying that there is in effect a motor vehicle liability policy for the benefit of the person required to furnish proof of financial responsibility. Such certificate shall give the effective date of such motor vehicle liability policy, which date shall be the same as the effective date of the certificate, and shall designate by explicit description or by appropriate reference all motor vehicles covered thereby, unless the policy is issued to a person who is not the owner of a motor vehicle.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-19; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 19, eff from and after January 1, 1953.

§ 63-15-41.
Certificate of insurance as proof of financial responsibility; nonresidents.

The nonresident owner of a motor vehicle, the owner or operator of which is not licensed in this state, may give proof of financial responsibility by filing with the department a written certificate or certificates of an insurance company authorized to transact business in the state in which the motor vehicle or motor vehicles described in such certificate or certificates are registered, or if such nonresident does not own a motor vehicle, then in the state in which the insured resides, provided such certificate otherwise conforms to the provisions of this chapter. The department shall accept the same upon condition that said insurance company complies with the following provisions with respect to the policies so certified:

Said insurance company shall execute a power of attorney authorizing the department to accept service on its behalf of notice or process in any action arising out of a motor vehicle accident in this state;

Said insurance company shall agree in writing that such policies shall be deemed to conform with the laws of this state relating to the terms of motor vehicle liability policies issued herein.

If any insurance company not authorized to transact business in this state, which has qualified to furnish proof of financial responsibility, defaults in any said undertakings or agreements, the department shall not thereafter accept as proof any certificate of said company whether theretofore filed or thereafter tendered as proof, so long as such default continues.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-20; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 20, eff from and after January 1, 1953.

§ 63-15-43.
Motor vehicle liability policy; definition; required provisions.

A “motor vehicle liability policy” as said term is used in this chapter shall mean an owner’s or an operator’s motor vehicle liability policy, that has been certified as provided in Section 63-15-39 or Section 63-15-41, as proof of financial responsibility, and issued, except as otherwise provided in Section 63-15-41, by an insurance company duly authorized to write motor vehicle liability insurance in this state, to or for the benefit of the person named therein as insured.

Such owner’s motor vehicle liability policy:

May be any motor vehicle liability policy form that has been filed with and approved by the Commissioner of Insurance and may contain exclusions and limitations on coverage as long as the exclusions and limitations language has been filed with and approved by the Commissioner of Insurance.

Shall have limits of liability no less than: Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) because of bodily injury to or death of one (1) person in any one (1) accident and, subject to said limit for one (1) person, Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) because of bodily injury to or death of two (2) or more persons in any one (1) accident, and Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) because of injury to or destruction of property of others in any one (1) accident.

Every motor vehicle liability policy certified under the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to the following provisions which need not be contained therein:

The liability of the insurance company with respect to the insurance required by this chapter shall become absolute whenever injury or damage covered by said motor vehicle liability policy occurs; said policy may not be cancelled or annulled as to such liability by any agreement between the insurance company and the insured after the occurrence of the injury or damage; no statement made by the insured or on his behalf and no violation of said policy shall defeat or void said policy;

The satisfaction by the insured of a judgment for such injury or damage shall not be a condition precedent to the right or duty of the insurance company to make payment on account of such injury or damage;

The insurance company shall have the right to settle any claim covered by the policy, and if such settlement is made in good faith, the amount thereof shall be deductible from the limits of liability specified in paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section; or

The policy, the written application therefor, if any, and any rider or endorsement which does not conflict with the provisions of the chapter shall constitute the entire contract between the parties.

Any policy which grants the coverage required for a motor vehicle liability policy may also grant any lawful coverage in excess of or in addition to the coverage specified for a motor vehicle liability policy, and such excess or additional coverage shall not be subject to the provisions of this chapter. With respect to a policy which grants such excess or additional coverage, the term “motor vehicle liability policy” shall apply only to that part of the coverage which is required by this section.

Any motor vehicle liability policy may provide that the insured shall reimburse the insurance company for any payment the insurance company would not have been obligated to make under the terms of the policy except for the provisions of this chapter.

Any motor vehicle liability policy may provide for the prorating of the insurance there under with other valid and collectible insurance.

The requirements for a motor vehicle liability policy may be fulfilled by the policies of one or more insurance companies which policies together meet such requirements.

Any binder issued pending the issuance of a motor vehicle liability policy shall be deemed to fulfill the requirements for such a policy.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-21; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 21; Laws, 1972, ch. 349, § 4; Laws, 2005, ch. 483, § 4; Laws, 2016, ch. 328, § 21; Laws, 2016, ch. 410, § 2, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2017.

§ 63-15-45.
Notice of cancellation or termination of certified policy.

When an insurance company has certified a motor vehicle liability policy under Section 63-15-39 or Section 63-15-41, the insurance so certified shall not be cancelled or terminated until at least ten (10) days after a notice of cancellation or termination of the insurance so certified shall be placed in the mail, or transmitted by electronic means, to the department. However, such a policy subsequently procured and certified shall, on the effective date of its certification, terminate the insurance previously certified with respect to any motor vehicle designated in both certificates.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-22; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 22; Laws, 2016, ch. 410, § 3, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2017.

§ 63-15-46.
Premium reductions for older drivers successfully completing accident prevention course.

Any rates, rating schedules, or rating manuals for the liability, personal injury protection and collision coverages of a motor vehicle insurance policy shall provide for an appropriate reduction in premium charges as to such coverages when the principal operator of the covered vehicle is an insured fifty-five (55) years of age or older who has successfully completed a motor vehicle accident prevention course approved by the Department of Public Safety. Any discount used by an insurer shall be presumed appropriate unless credible data demonstrates otherwise.

The premium reduction required by this section shall be effective for an insured for a period of three (3) years after successful completion of the approved course, except that the insurer may require, as a condition of maintaining the discount, that the insured:

Not be involved in an accident for which the insured is at fault; and

Not be convicted, plead guilty or plead nolo contendere to a moving traffic violation.

Motor vehicle accident prevention courses for the purposes of this section shall be subject to the approval of the Department of Public Safety. The department shall consider the competency of the personnel offering the course, the quality of the content and activities of the course with respect to its capability to prevent accidents by persons fifty-five (55) years of age or older who complete the course, and the reasonableness of the fee for the course. The department shall establish the minimum number of hours necessary for completion of a course. A course approved by the department shall require persons completing the course to pass a written test evaluating the person’s knowledge of the content of the course.

Upon successfully completing the approved course, each person shall be issued a certificate by the organization offering the course which shall be used to qualify for the premium discount required by this section.

This section shall not apply in the event the approved course is taken as punishment specified by a court or other governmental entity resulting from a moving traffic violation.

This section shall apply to policies issued or renewed after January 1, 1988.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 492, eff from and after passage (approved April 20, 1987), and applicable to policies issued after January 1, 1988.

§ 63-15-47.
Applicability of chapter to policies of motor vehicle insurance.

This chapter shall not be held to apply to or affect policies of motor vehicle insurance against liability which may now or hereafter be required by any other law of this state. Such policies, if they contain an agreement or are endorsed to conform to the requirements of this chapter, may be certified as proof of financial responsibility under this chapter.

This chapter shall not be held to apply to or affect policies insuring solely the insured named in the policy against liability resulting from the maintenance or use by persons in the insured’s employ or on his behalf of motor vehicles not owned by the insured.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-23; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 23, eff from and after January 1, 1953.

§ 63-15-49.
Bond as proof of financial responsibility.

Proof of financial responsibility may be furnished by filing a bond with the department, accompanied by the statutory recording fee of the chancery clerk to cover the cost of recordation of the notice provided for herein. The bond may be either a surety bond with a surety company authorized to do business within the state or a bond with at least two individual sureties each owning real estate within the state not exempt under the constitution or laws of the State of Mississippi and together having equities equal in value to at least twice the amount of such bond. In cases of a bond with two individual sureties, such real estate shall be scheduled and a description thereof shall appear in the bond approved by the clerk of the chancery court of the county or counties in which the real estate is located and also approved by the tax collector of the county or counties where the property is situated as being free from any delinquent tax liens. Such bond shall be conditioned for payments in amounts and under the same circumstances as would be required in a motor vehicle liability policy, and shall not be cancellable except after five days’ written notice is received by the department. However, cancellation shall not prevent recovery with respect to any right or cause of action arising prior to the date of cancellation. Such bond shall constitute a lien in favor of the state upon the real estate so scheduled of any surety, which lien shall exist in favor of any holder of a final judgment against the person who has filed such bond. Notice to that effect, which shall include a description of the real estate scheduled in the bond, shall be filed by the department in the office of the chancery clerk of the county where such real estate is situated. Such notice shall be accompanied by the statutory fee for the services of the chancery clerk in connection with the recordation of such notice, and the chancery clerk or his deputy, upon receipt of such notice, shall acknowledge and cause the same to be recorded in the lien records. Recordation shall constitute notice as provided by the statutes governing the recordation of liens on real estate.

If a judgment rendered against the principal on such surety or real estate bond shall not be satisfied within sixty days after it has become final, the judgment creditor may, for his own use and benefit and at his sole expense, bring an action or actions in the name of the state against the persons who executed such bond, including an action or proceeding to foreclose any lien that may exist upon the real estate of a person who has executed such real estate bond, which foreclosure action shall be brought in like manner and subject to all the provisions of law applicable to an action to foreclose a mortgage on real estate.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-24; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 24; Laws, 1968, ch. 361, § 13, eff from and after January 1, 1972.

§ 63-15-51.
Deposit of cash or securities as proof of financial responsibility.

Proof of financial responsibility may be evidenced by the certificate of the state treasurer that the person named therein has deposited with him fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000.00) in cash, or securities such as may legally be purchased by savings banks or for trust funds of a market value of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000.00). The state treasurer shall not accept any such deposit and issue a certificate therefor and the department shall not accept such certificate unless accompanied by evidence that there are no unsatisfied judgments of any character against the depositor in the county where the depositor resides.

Such deposit shall be held by the state treasurer to satisfy, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, any execution on a judgment issued against such person making the deposit, for damages, including damages for care and loss of services, because of bodily injury to or death of any person, or for damages because of injury to or destruction of property, including the loss of use thereof, resulting from the ownership, maintenance, use or operation of a motor vehicle after such deposit was made. Money or securities so deposited shall not be subject to attachment or execution unless such attachment or execution shall arise out of a suit for damages as aforesaid.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-25; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 25, eff from and after January 1, 1953.

§ 63-15-53.
Self-insurance.

Any person in whose name more than 25 motor vehicles are licensed may qualify as a self-insurer by obtaining a certificate of self-insurance issued by the department as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

The department may, in its discretion, upon the application of a person, issue a certificate of self-insurance when it is satisfied that such person is possessed and will continue to be possessed of ability to pay judgments obtained against such person.

Upon not less than five days notice and a hearing pursuant to such notice, the department may upon reasonable grounds cancel a certificate of self-insurance. Failure to pay any judgment within thirty days after such judgment shall have become final shall constitute a reasonable ground for the cancellation of a certificate of self-insurance.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-34; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 33, eff from and after January 1, 1953.

§ 63-15-55.
Acceptance of proof of financial responsibility given by owner for other operators.

Whenever any person required to give proof of financial responsibility under this chapter is or later becomes an operator in the employ of any owner, or is or later becomes a member of the immediate family or household of the owner, the department shall accept proof given by such owner in lieu of proof by such other person to permit such other person to operate a motor vehicle for which the owner has given proof as herein provided. The department shall designate the restrictions imposed by this section on the face of such person’s license.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285-26; Laws, 1952, ch. 359, § 26, eff from and after January 1, 1953.